Linux/l10n/ispell/ukrainian.dict
велич/EL
великодушн╕сть/E
верм╕шель/EL
вертикаль/EL
верблюденя/F
веселощ╕/S
весняний/G
вуаль/EL
вусики/S
видатки/S
виконуваний/G
вим╕р/S
вимоглив╕сть/E
вис╕лки/S
витравлений/G
вибухонебезпечн╕сть/E
виб╕г/S
вибори/S
в╕дм╕нений/G
в╕дносини/S
в╕дпов╕дь/EL
в╕др╕г/S
в╕дрядн╕сть/E
в╕дб╕г/S
в╕сь/EL
в╕тчизняний/G
в╕олончель/EL
владн╕сть/E
вза╓мов╕дносини/S
в'язь/EL
вовченя/F
вогнетривк╕сть/E
водог╕н/S
водонап╕рний/G
водозаб╕р/S
вороненя/F
восьмин╕г/S
гавань/EL
галантн╕сть/E
галузь/EL
гантель/EL
гармонь/EL
гать/EL
газель/EL
газофазний/G
гетерополярн╕сть/E
гуаш/EL
гусеня/F
г╕н/S
г╕рський/G
гнучк╕сть/E
граченя/F
грань/EL
груди/S
грош╕/S
гробовий/G
гом╕н/S
горизонталь/EL
гортань/EL
фугасний/G
фланель/EL
формальн╕сть/E
фототовари/S
жабеня/F
жертвоприносини/S
живописний/G
жижки/S
житт╓в╕сть/E
жовч/EL
ав╕аподорож/EL
автопромислов╕сть/E
агрох╕м╕кати/S
аеродинам╕чний/G
акварель/EL
ал╕менти/S
англосаксонський/G
антресоль/EL
апарель/EL
арктичний/G
двер╕/S
дводенний/G
джунгл╕/S
далеч╕нь/EL
далекоглядн╕сть/E
далеком╕р/S
депонований/G
дурощ╕/S
дитя/F
д╕агональ/EL
д╕алектичний/G
д╕ловит╕сть/E
друз╕/S
дзв╕н/S
дог╕длив╕сть/E
до╕сторичний/G
док╕р/S
доброд╕йн╕сть/E
екситонний/G
електро╓мн╕сть/E
емаль/EL
еоловий/G
щеня/F
щипц╕/S
учен╕сть/E
упоряджений/G
усемогутн╕сть/E
уб╕р/S
челядь/EL
червон╕сть/E
червонощокий/G
чохли/S
церемонн╕сть/E
цив╕льний/G
ц╕ль/EL
Анди/S
Астрахань/EL
╕м'я/F
╕нвал╕дн╕сть/E
╕ндиченя/F
╕нерц╕йний/G
╕постась/EL
╕стинн╕сть/E
╖жаченя/F
Кубань/EL
кволий/G
каверзи/S
каченя/F
канцтовари/S
кан╕фоль/EL
карамель/EL
карусель/EL
казковий/G
кефаль/EL
кеди/S
кусачки/S
клапанний/G
клапт╕/S
кл╕ть/E
криж╕/S
кроленя/F
кро╓ний/G
колюч╕сть/E
кон╕чний/G
конов'язь/EL
конопл╕/S
корисн╕сть/E
козеня/F
кошеня/F
лавровий/G
лапки/S
латинь/EL
левеня/F
легк╕/S
легкодух╕сть/E
лелеченя/F
лисеня/F
л╕лейний/G
л╕нощ╕/S
лють/EL
лосеня/F
майстерн╕сть/E
майстри/S
малиновий/G
мазь/EL
мазкий/G
медаль/EL
мемуари/S
миловидн╕сть/E
мить/EL
мишачий/G
мишеня/F
м╕р╕ади/S
м╕страль/EL
множинн╕сть/E
модель/EL
молодь/EL
молод╕жний/G
молод╕сть/E
надкушений/G
надпров╕дн╕сть/E
найп╕дступн╕ший/G
нал╕г/S
нап╕вв╕сь/EL
нап╕вавтоматичний/G
наручники/S
народжуван╕сть/E
набитий/G
нев╕дворотн╕сть/E
негаразди/S
негреня/F
недогадливий/G
недор╕куват╕сть/E
нем╕ч/EL
немовля/F
неможлив╕сть/E
неприкаяний/G
непом╕рн╕сть/E
несв╕дом╕сть/E
незам╕щений/G
незначн╕сть/E
нутрощ╕/S
низькочастотний/G
нормаль/EL
нормальн╕сть/E
пампаси/S
паморозь/EL
папороть/EL
парал╕зований/G
пастораль/EL
перев'язь/EL
переговори/S
передрукований/G
перифрази/S
перископ╕чний/G
пер╕одичн╕сть/E
п╕вн╕ч/EL
п╕дкислений/G
п╕длеслив╕сть/E
п╕дмостки/S
п╕нний/G
п╕шоходами/S
плаксив╕сть/E
пл╕чки/S
плоть/EL
правосв╕дом╕сть/E
пресований/G
причетн╕сть/E
приписаний/G
пристань/EL
пристрасн╕сть/E
проекц╕йний/G
промтовари/S
промовист╕сть/E
протиракетний/G
проходим╕сть/E
пташеня/F
п'ядь/EL
погань/EL
погр╕шн╕сть/E
погоджувальний/G
пожитки/S
подорож/EL
полуниц╕/S
пом╕щицький/G
пом╕рн╕сть/E
поступов╕сть/E
пост╕ль/EL
потребуючий/G
похорони/S
раптов╕сть/E
реваншистський/G
рейтузи/S
рухлив╕сть/E
римований/G
рись/EL
р╕ч/EL
р╕зносторонн╕сть/E
роль/EL
розг╕н/S
розжалуваний/G
розкладн╕сть/E
розпов╕дь/EL
розпод╕лений/G
розхлябан╕сть/E
сферо╖дальний/G
сам╕тн╕сть/E
селяни/S
сентиментальн╕сть/E
сербський/G
сум╕ш/EL
суп╕дрядн╕сть/E
сируватий/G
с╕дниц╕/S
с╕ль/EL
скам'ян╕л╕сть/E
сланкий/G
слоненя/F
смертн╕сть/E
сп╕льн╕сть/E
сп╕раль/EL
справедливий/G
сталь/EL
старанн╕сть/E
стерлядь/EL
ст╕льники/S
ст╕нний/G
совеня/F
соб╕варт╕сть/E
соболиний/G
твердь/EL
тв╕р/S
теплоцентраль/EL
тужливий/G
тигреня/F
т╕м'я/F
традиц╕йн╕сть/E
трель/EL
трубчастий/G
трубопроводи/S
толь/EL
╓диновладний/G
зв╕р/S
зв╕ря/F
згубн╕сть/E
зав╕сь/EL
загальнопол╕тичний/G
загибель/EL
зайченя/F
заколений/G
замет╕ль/EL
запратий/G
запов╕дь/EL
засл╕н/S
заточений/G
заболочен╕сть/E
зустр╕ч/EL
з╕м'ятий/G
зм╕╓ня/F
зношен╕сть/E
збори/S
ягня/F
шановний/G
шахи/S
шинель/EL
шрапнель/EL
штанц╕/S
хвацьк╕сть/E
харч╕/S
хованки/S
багатоканальний/G
бандероль/E
бат╕г/S
бемоль/EL
безкрил╕сть/E
безл╕ч/EL
безперешкодний/G
безстрашн╕сть/E
бубони/S
б╕лченя/F
б╕сеня/F
братерський/G
брезкл╕сть/E
бязь/EL
окуляри/S
округл╕сть/E
оленя/F
он╕м╕лий/G
опов╕дь/EL
оргвисновки/S
орля/F
осленя/F
обер╕г/S
облаяний/G
образлив╕сть/E
Познань/EL
